Louisiana, session 2026, HB1225.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1898.1 through 1898.9 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1898.1. Louisiana fair insurance modeling and transparency
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Fair
Insurance Modeling and Transparency Act".
§1898.2. Legislative findings and intent
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares:
(1) Many regions in this state have experienced catastrophic flooding and
wind damage from hurricanes and severe weather events, including but not limited
to Hurricane Katrina, Hurricane Rita, Hurricane Ida, and other storms.
(2) Since 2005, federal, state, and local governments have invested tens of
billions of dollars in flood protection, storm surge barriers, levees, drainage systems,
and related infrastructure across multiple regions of the state.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1991 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1225
(3) Residential property insurance rates should reasonably reflect current,
location-specific risk conditions, including certified mitigation infrastructure,
elevation improvements, and storm protection systems.
(4) Catastrophe modeling plays a central role in determining insurance rates,
yet the assumptions underlying such models are often not transparent to regulators
or the public.
(5) The purpose of this Section is not to mandate specific insurance rates or
modeling approaches, but to ensure all of the following:
(a) Transparency.
(b) Accountability.
(c) Consideration of post-mitigation conditions.
(d) Fair treatment of policyholders across all regions within this state.
§1898.3. Definitions
(1) "Catastrophe model" means any probabilistic or deterministic model used
to estimate losses from wind, hurricane, flood, or storm surge events.
(2) "Geographically differentiated risk analysis" means actuarial evaluation
of risk at a sub-state level, including by parish, region, elevation, or infrastructure
protection level.
(3) "Post-mitigation conditions" means flood protection systems, storm surge
barriers, levees, flood walls, pumping systems, elevation improvements, and other
infrastructure constructed, upgraded, or certified after major storm events, including
but not limited to improvements made after 2005.
(4) "Residential property insurance" means insurance coverage for
owner-occupied or tenant-occupied one-to-four family dwellings.
(5) "Sensitivity analysis" means a comparison of modeled losses under
alternative assumptions regarding mitigation infrastructure or hazard intensity.
§1898.4. Catastrophe model disclosure requirements
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1991 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1225
A. Any insurer filing rates for residential property insurance in this state
shall include, as part of its rate filing, a standardized catastrophe modeling
disclosure.
B. The disclosure shall include all of the following:
(1) Model vendor, name, and version.
(2) Exposure data date and trending methodology.
(3) Whether the model incorporates post-mitigation conditions in this state.
(4) Description of how flood protection, storm surge systems, and drainage
infrastructure are treated.
(5) Whether assumptions reflect pre- or post-mitigation conditions.
(6) Identification of geographic resolution used, including statewide,
regional, and parish-level.
C. The commissioner shall prescribe the form and manner of disclosure.
§1898.5. Required sensitivity testing
A. Insurers shall provide a sensitivity analysis demonstrating both of the
following:
(1) Modeled losses assuming full recognition of post-mitigation conditions.
(2) Modeled losses assuming conservative or pre-mitigation conditions.
B. This requirement applies statewide but shall be particularly detailed in all
of the following:
(1) Coastal regions.
(2) Flood-prone regions.
(3) Areas with significant mitigation investments.
C. Nothing in this Section shall require adoption of any specific model.
§1898.6. Separation of wind and flood surge assumptions
A. Insurers shall disaggregate catastrophe modeling assumptions into any of
the following:
(1) Wind-only loss components.
(2) Flood and storm surge loss components.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1991 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1225
(3) Combined or correlated loss assumptions.
B. This data shall be submitted in a format prescribed by the commissioner.
§1898.7. Geographic risk differentiation authority
A. The commissioner may approve or require geographically differentiated
risk analysis across this state where credible actuarial evidence demonstrates
materially different risk characteristics.
B. Differentiation may consider any of the following:
(1) Flood protection systems.
(2) Elevation.
(3) Drainage capacity.
(4) Proximity to coast or water bodies.
(5) Post-mitigation infrastructure.
C. The purpose of this Section is to ensure that risk evaluations reflect
material differences among communities rather than relying on statewide averages.
§1898.8. Legislative reporting
A. Beginning January 1, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the
Department of Insurance shall report to the Legislature all of the following:
(1) How catastrophe models account for mitigation infrastructure across the
state.
(2) Trends in wind versus flood and surge assumptions.
(3) Impacts on insurance premiums attributable to modeling assumptions.
(4) Regional disparities in modeled risk.
§1898.9. Rulemaking Authority
A. The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement this Act.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1991 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1225